Massachusetts, session 194th, H1966.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 70A of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-
The expense of any attorney’s fees and costs incurred in enforcing the liability of the
tortfeasor and in obtaining such judgment, compromise or settlement shall be divided between
the health maintenance organization, or hospital, medical or dental service corporation and the
injured person in proportion to the amounts received by them from any such judgment,
settlement or compromise. If the settlement, judgment or funds available to satisfy the judgment
are less than the amount of plaintiff’s total damages, the court may reduce after a hearing the
amount of said insurer’s lien in the action, after evaluation of the plaintiff’s total cognizable
damages at law.
of 3

SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 70D the following section:-
Section 70D ½. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 70A to 70D, inclusive, and
any contractual term to the contrary, no health maintenance organization or group or individual
medical insurer or disability insurer which has provided benefits for covered services to a person
insured in an accident shall have a lien or right of reimbursement or subrogation claim or claims
of recoupment no matter how designated upon any recovery or sum had or collected or to be
collected, whether by judgment or by settlement or compromise from another person as damages
on account of such injuries, for more than the proportionate share of said recovery or sum subject
to its lien, right or reimbursement, subrogation claim or claims of recoupment which the amount
of benefits so provided for covered services bears to the complete value of the injured person’s
tort damages.
Either the entity which provided benefits or the injured person may petition the court in
which the accident case is pending, or in a court in which such case could be properly filed had
settlement not been attained before commencement of suit, for a determination of the
reasonableness of the settlement and the fair allocation of amounts payable thereunder. A hearing
on such petition shall adhere to the same procedural requirement as provided in section 15 of
chapter 152.
SECTION 3. Chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 72 the following section:-
Section 72A. In any action in which an injured person enters into a settlement with, or
obtains a judgment upon trial from a third party and benefits for such person’s injuries have been
of 3

paid under chapter 152, and the injured person and the insurer paying said benefits do not agree
to the amount each is entitled to recover out of such settlement or judgment, there shall be a just
and reasonable apportionment thereof in accordance with this section; provided, however if the
settlement, judgment or funds available to satisfy the judgment are less than the amount of
plaintiff’s total damages, the court or other authority authorized to approve settlements under
section 15 of chapter 152 may reduce after a hearing the amount of said insurer’s lien in the
action, after evaluation of the plaintiff’s total cognizable damages at law. Except in the case of a
final judgment, where the plaintiff is dissatisfied with the apportionment by the court, he may
withdraw his consent to the settlement.
of 3